Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB652.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF THE KENTUCKY RULES OF
EVIDENCE IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Evidence of any criminal charges, including a conviction, plea of guilty, or a
Presidential pardon, arising from the events of January 6, 2021, in the District of
Columbia shall not be admissable in any civil or criminal proceeding against the
defendant who was charged, made the plea, was found guilty, or was pardoned.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/17/2025 10:52 AM Jacketed